Vermont statutes. Title 22 Libraries, History, and Information Technology
Subchapter 5. Advisory Council on Historic Preservation

§ 741.
Creation of Advisory Council.

There is established a Vermont Advisory Council on Historic Preservation. The Council shall consist of seven members, appointed by the Governor, at least four of whom shall fulfill the professional requirements of the National Historic Preservation Act.

The members shall serve for terms of three years or until their successors are appointed.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 109

, § 4; amended

1979, No. 61

, § 2.

§ 742.
Duties and powers of the Council.

The Council shall:

Approve nominations to the State and National Registers of Historic Places.

Review and approve the State survey of historic properties undertaken in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

Review and approve the content of the State Preservation Plan developed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

Approve the removal of properties from the State register.

Recommend the removal of properties from the National Register.

Review and approve projects to receive federal and State grants-in-aid for historic preservation.

Provide an advisory and coordinative mechanism by which State undertakings of every kind which are potentially deleterious to historic preservation may be discussed, and, where possible, resolved, giving due consideration to the competing public interests which may be involved. The head of any State agency or department having direct or indirect jurisdiction over a proposed State or State-assisted undertaking, or independent agency having authority to build, construct, license, permit, authorize, or approve any undertaking, shall, prior to the approval of the State funds for the undertaking, or prior to any approval, license, permit, or authorization as the case may be, take into account the effect of the undertaking on any historic property that is included in the State Register of Historic Places. Where, in the judgment of the Council such undertaking will have an adverse effect upon any listed district, area, site, building, structure, or object, the head of the State agency or department shall afford the Council reasonable opportunity to comment with regard to the undertaking.

Advise on any participation in the review of federal, federally assisted, and federally licensed undertakings that may affect historic properties and sites and approve any participation in the review of nonfederal undertakings, including proceedings under the State land use and development act (10 V.S.A. chapter 151).

The Council may provide testimony relating to the historical, architectural, and archaeological significance of State register and national register sites.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 109

, § 4; amended

1979, No. 61

,§§ 3, 4.

§ 743.
Cooperation of agencies.

An agency, department, division, or commission shall:

Consult the Vermont Advisory Council on Historic Preservation before demolishing, altering, or transferring any property that is potentially of historical, architectural, archaeological, or cultural significance, including any property listed on the State register. An agency, department, division, or commission shall submit its annual capital improvement plan to the Council.

Initiate measures and procedures to provide for the maintenance, through preservation, rehabilitation, or restoration, of properties under its ownership that are listed on the State or National Register; the measures and procedures shall comply with applicable standards prescribed by the State Historic Preservation Division.

Develop plans for the maintenance, through preservation, rehabilitation, or restoration, of historic properties under their ownership in a manner compatible with preservation objectives and which does not result in an unreasonable economic burden to public interest.

Institute procedures to assure that its plans, programs, codes and regulations contribute to the preservation and enhancement of sites, structures and objects of historical, architectural, archaeological or cultural significance.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 109

, § 4.